California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(10) Within six months of the effective date of this subdivision, the California Film Commission shall:

(A) Establish procedures to certify a certified studio construction
 project.

(B) Establish procedures to verify a qualified motion picture has met the criteria established in this section for filming in a certified studio construction project facility. That procedure shall include a requirement that the qualified motion picture pay 0.5 percent of the approved credit amount to the Career Pathways Training program specified in subdivision (e).

(C) (i) Implementation of this subdivision for the 2023–24 fiscal year is deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare and, therefore, the California Film Commission is hereby authorized to adopt emergency regulations to implement this subdivision during the 2023–24 fiscal year in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part
 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(ii) The California Film Commission shall adopt regulations in order to implement this paragraph.

(iii) The California Film Commission shall not be required to prepare an economic impact analysis pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) with regard to any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision.

(11) In the case where the credit allowed by this subdivision exceeds the taxpayer’s tax liability computed under this part, the excess credit may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding eight taxable years, if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.

(12) Upon completion of construction or renovation of the soundstage or soundstages, the certified studio construction project applicant shall certify to the California Film Commission that all contractors and subcontractors performing construction work on the soundstage or soundstages were required to use a skilled and trained workforce to perform such work in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 17053.99.

(13) (A) Upon completion of construction or renovation of the soundstage or soundstages, the soundstage or soundstages shall be continuously operated, maintained, and repaired by any of the following:

(i) A workforce that is paid at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to
 Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, if such services are performed by a workforce that is employed directly, or indirectly through a motion picture payroll services company, by the owner or affiliate of the owner of the soundstage or lessee of the soundstage described in subclause (II) of clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of this subdivision.

(ii) A skilled and trained workforce as defined in Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, if such services are provided by third-party vendors.

(B) Each year following completion of construction or renovation of the soundstage or soundstages that a qualified motion picture is allocated a tax credit pursuant to this subdivision, the certified studio construction project applicant shall certify to the California Film Commission both of the following:

(i) The total amount of payments to third-party vendors or qualified wages for operation, maintenance, and repair of the certified soundstage.

(ii) The amount and percentage of the total amount of payments to third-party vendors or qualified wages for operation, maintenance, and repair of the certified soundstage performed by each workforce described in subparagraph (A).

(C) If the percentage paid to workers in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) is certified to be 90 percent of the total amount under clause (i) of subparagraph (B) or greater, the qualified taxpayer shall be entitled to 100 percent of the applicable credit issued under this subdivision for the period. If the percentage paid to workers in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) is certified to be less than 90 percent of the total amount under clause (i) of
 subparagraph (B) but greater than or equal to 75 percent of the total amount under clause (i) of subparagraph (B), the qualified taxpayer shall be entitled to 50 percent of the applicable credit issued under this subdivision for the period. If the percentage paid to workers in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) is certified to be less than 75 percent of the total amount under clause (i) of subparagraph (B), the qualified taxpayer shall not be entitled to any credit issued under this subdivision for the applicable period.

(14) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the changes made to this subdivision by the act adding this paragraph shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023.

(B) The changes made to subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) by the act adding this paragraph shall apply for all taxable years to any certified studio
 construction project that has been certified, and any qualified motion picture that has been allocated a credit, pursuant to this subdivision.

(l) Section 41 shall not apply to the credits allowed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 344, Sec. 9.   (SB 186)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23698.1.

(a) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer a credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, subject to a computation and ranking by the California Film Commission in subdivision (g) and the allocation amount categories described in subdivision (i), in an amount equal to 35 or 40 percent, whichever is the applicable credit percentage described in paragraph (4), of the qualified expenditures for the production of a qualified motion picture in California. A credit shall not be allowed under this section for any qualified expenditures for the production of a motion picture in California if a credit has been claimed for those same expenditures under Section 23685, 23695, or 23698.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the credit shall be allowed for the taxable year in which the California Film Commission issues the credit certificate pursuant to subdivision (g) for the qualified motion picture, but in no instance prior to July 1, 2025, and shall be for the applicable percentage of all qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer in all taxable years for that qualified motion picture.

(3) (A) The amount of the credit allowed to a qualified taxpayer shall be limited to the amount specified in the credit certificate issued to the qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g).

(B) In determining the amount specified in the credit certificate in subparagraph (A), the California Film Commission shall be limited to the following amounts of qualified expenditures
 for each qualified motion picture:

(i) In the case of a feature, up to one hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000).

(ii) In the case of a miniseries or limited series described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (19) of subdivision (b), up to one hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000).

(iii) In the case of a television series described in clause (iii) or clause (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (19) of subdivision (b), up to one hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000) per season.

(iv) In the case of an independent film, up to twenty million dollars ($20,000,000).

(4) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2), the applicable credit percentage shall be as
 follows:

(A) Thirty-five percent of the qualified expenditures attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California, including, but not limited to, a feature or a television series that relocated to California that is in its second or subsequent years of receiving a tax credit allocation pursuant to this section, or Section 23685, 23695, or 23698.

(B) Forty percent of the qualified expenditures attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California where the qualified motion picture is a television series that relocated to California in its first year of receiving a tax credit allocation pursuant to this section.

(C) Thirty-five percent of the qualified expenditures attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture that is an independent film.

(D) Additional credits shall be allowed for the production of a qualified motion picture which applicable credit percentage is determined pursuant to subparagraph (A), in an aggregate amount not to exceed 5 percent of the qualified expenditures under that subparagraph, as follows:

(i) (I) Five percent of qualified expenditures, excluding qualified wages described in subparagraph (E), relating to original photography outside the Los Angeles zone.

(II) For purposes of this clause and subparagraph (E):

(ia) “Applicable period” means the period that commences with preproduction and ends when original photography concludes. The applicable period includes the time necessary to strike a remote location and return to the Los Angeles zone.

(ib) “Los Angeles zone” means the area within a circle 30 miles in radius from Beverly Boulevard and La Cienega Boulevard, Los Angeles, California, and includes Agua Dulce, Castaic, including Castaic Lake, Leo Carrillo State Beach, Ontario International Airport, Piru, and Pomona, including the Los Angeles County Fairgrounds. The Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer, Inc. Conejo Ranch property is within the Los Angeles zone.

(ic) “Original photography” includes principal photography and reshooting original footage.

(id) “Qualified expenditures relating to original photography outside the Los Angeles zone” means amounts paid or incurred during the applicable period for tangible personal property purchased or leased and used or consumed outside the Los Angeles zone and relating to original photography outside the Los Angeles zone and
 qualified wages paid for services performed outside the Los Angeles zone and relating to original photography outside the Los Angeles zone.

(ii) Five percent of the qualified expenditures relating to qualified visual effects attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California.

(E) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (D), an amount equal to 10 percent of qualified wages paid for services performed relating to original photography outside of the Los Angeles zone to qualified individuals who reside in California but outside the Los Angeles zone shall be allowed as an additional credit for the production of a qualified motion picture which applicable credit percentage is determined pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C).

(ii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (D), an amount equal to 5
 percent of qualified wages paid for services performed relating to original photography outside of the Los Angeles zone to qualified individuals who reside in California but outside the Los Angeles zone shall be allowed as an additional credit for the production of a qualified motion picture which applicable credit percentage is determined pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Ancillary product” means any article for sale to the public that contains a portion of, or any element of, the qualified motion picture.

(2) “Budget” means an estimate of all expenses paid or incurred during the production period of a qualified motion picture. It shall be the same budget used by the qualified taxpayer and production company for all qualified motion picture purposes.

(3) “Clip use” means a use of any portion of a motion picture, other than the qualified motion picture, used in the qualified motion picture.

(4) “Credit certificate” means the certificate issued by the California Film Commission pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (g).

(5) “Diversity workplan checklist” means a checklist developed by regulation by the California Film Commission that may include consideration of inclusive hiring above the line, inclusive hiring below the line, equity education, industry capacity building and supplier diversity as part of any diversity workplan.

(6) (A) “Employee fringe benefits” means the amount allowable as a deduction under this part to the qualified taxpayer involved in the
 production of the qualified motion picture, exclusive of any amounts contributed by employees, for any year during the production period with respect to any of the following:

(i) Employer contributions under any pension, profit sharing, annuity, or similar plan.

(ii) Employer-provided coverage under any accident or health plan for employees.

(iii) The employer’s cost of life or disability insurance provided to employees.

(B) Any amount treated as wages under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (21) shall not be taken into account under this paragraph.

(7) “Independent film” means a motion picture with a minimum budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) that is produced by a
 company that is not publicly traded and publicly traded companies do not own, directly or indirectly, more than 30 percent of the producing company.

(8) “Jobs ratio” means the amount of qualified wages paid to qualified individuals divided by the amount of tax credit, not including any additional credit allowed pursuant to subparagraphs (D) and (E) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), as computed by the California Film Commission. For the purposes of the calculation of the jobs ratio only, 70 percent of qualified expenditures for visual effects paid to third-party vendors for work performed in California shall be deemed to be qualified wages paid to a qualified individual.

(9) “Licensing” means any grant of rights to distribute the qualified motion picture, in whole or in part.

(10) “New use” means any use of a
 motion picture in a medium other than the medium for which it was initially created.

(11) “Pilot for a new television series” means the initial episode produced for a proposed television series.

(12) (A) “Postproduction” means the final activities in a qualified motion picture’s production, including editing, foley recording, automatic dialogue replacement, sound editing, scoring, music track recording by musicians and music editing, beginning and end credits, negative cutting, negative processing and duplication, the addition of sound and visual effects, sound mixing, film-to-tape transfers, encoding, and color correction.

(B) “Postproduction” does not include the manufacture or shipping of release prints or their equivalent.

(13) “Preproduction” means the process of preparation for actual physical production which begins after a qualified motion picture has received a firm agreement of financial commitment, or is greenlit, with, for example, the establishment of a dedicated production office, the hiring of key crew members, and includes, but is not limited to, activities that include location scouting and execution of contracts with vendors of equipment and stage space.

(14) “Principal photography” means the phase of production during which the motion picture is actually shot, as distinguished from preproduction and postproduction.

(15) “Production period” means the period beginning with preproduction and ending upon completion of postproduction.

(16) “Qualified entity” means a personal service corporation as defined in
 Section 269A(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, a payroll services corporation, or any entity receiving qualified wages with respect to services performed by a qualified individual.

(17) “Qualified expenditures” means amounts paid or incurred for tangible personal property purchased or leased, and used, within this state in the production of a qualified motion picture and payments, including qualified wages, for services performed within this state in the production of a qualified motion picture.

(18) (A) “Qualified individual” means any individual who performs services during the production period in an activity related to the production of a qualified motion picture.

(B) “Qualified individual” shall not include either of the following:

(i) Any individual related to the qualified taxpayer as described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of Section 51(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(ii) Any 5-percent owner, as defined in Section 416(i)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, of the qualified taxpayer.

(19) (A) “Qualified motion picture” means a motion picture that is produced for distribution to the general public, regardless of medium, that is one of the following:

(i) A feature with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(ii) A miniseries or limited series consisting of two or more episodes, each longer than 40 minutes of running time, exclusive of commercials, that is produced in
 California, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode.

(iii) An independent film.

(iv) A television series that relocated to California.

(v) A pilot for a new live action or animated television series that is at least 20 minutes of running time, exclusive of commercials, that is produced in California, and with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(vi) A live action or animated series, averaging across a season at least 20 minutes of running time per episode, exclusive of commercials, that is produced in California, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode.

(vii) An animated film that
 is produced in California, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(viii) A large-scale competition show, not including traditional reality, game shows, talk shows, or docufollow television programming, that is produced in California, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode.

(B) To qualify as a “qualified motion picture,” all of the following conditions shall be satisfied:

(i) At least 75 percent of the principal photography days occur wholly in California or 75 percent of the production budget is incurred for payment for services performed within the state and the purchase or rental of property used within the state.

(ii) Production of the qualified motion picture is completed
 within 30 months from the date on which the qualified taxpayer’s application is approved by the California Film Commission. For purposes of this section, a qualified motion picture is “completed” when the process of postproduction has been finished.

(iii) The copyright for the motion picture is registered with the United States Copyright Office pursuant to Title 17 of the United States Code.

(iv) (I) Except as provided in subclause (II), principal photography of the qualified motion picture commences after the date on which the application is approved by the California Film Commission, but no later than 180 days after the date of that approval if the qualified motion picture has a budget with qualified expenditures of less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), and no later than 240 days after the date of that approval in the case of a qualified
 motion picture with a budget of qualified expenditures with at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), unless death, disability, or disfigurement of the director or of a principal cast member; an act of God, including, but not limited to, fire, flood, earthquake, storm, hurricane, or other natural disaster; terrorist activities; or government sanction has directly prevented a production’s ability to begin principal photography within the prescribed 180- or 240-day commencement period.

(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), a production that has not previously received an allocation under this section or Section 23685, 23695, or 23698, and that completed principal photography of the previous season more than 48 months prior to the application for a credit allocation under this section, shall be deemed not to have commenced principal photography prior to the date on which the application for an allocation of credit under this section is
 approved by the California Film Commission.

(III) Notwithstanding subclauses (I) and (II), a television series that did not commence principal photography prior to July 1, 2025, and applied for but did not receive an allocation under this section for its first season filming in California and makes an application for allocation of credit for its second season filming in California shall be deemed not to have commenced principal photography prior to the date on which the application for an allocation of credit under this section is approved by the California Film Commission.

(v) (I) At least 75 percent of production costs for picture editing and postproduction sound labor and services shall be incurred in California.

(II) This requirement shall only apply to a qualified motion picture applying
 for an allocation of credits under this section pursuant to subparagraph (G) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98 or Section 23698.

(vi) Provides a diversity workplan checklist.

(C) For the purposes of subparagraph (A), in computing the total wages paid or incurred for the production of a qualified motion picture, all amounts paid or incurred by all persons or entities that share in the costs of the qualified motion picture shall be aggregated.

(D) “Qualified motion picture” shall not include commercial advertising, music videos, a motion picture produced for private noncommercial use, such as weddings, graduations, or as part of an educational course and made by students, a news program, current events or public events program, talk show, game show, sporting event or activity, awards show,
 telethon or other production that solicits funds, reality television program, except as specified in clause (ix) of subparagraph (A), clip-based programming if more than 50 percent of the content is comprised of licensed footage, documentaries, variety programs, daytime dramas, strip shows, or any production that falls within the recordkeeping requirements of Section 2257 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(20) (A) “Qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer, or a single member limited liability company that is disregarded for tax purposes pursuant to Section 23038, who has paid or incurred qualified expenditures, participated in the Career Readiness requirement in Section 23695, and has been issued a credit certificate by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g).

(B) In the case of any pass-thru entity, the determination of whether a taxpayer
 is a qualified taxpayer under this section shall be made at the entity level and any credit under this section is not allowed to the pass-thru entity, but shall be passed through to the partners or shareholders in accordance with applicable provisions of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001). For purposes of this paragraph, “pass-thru entity” means any entity taxed as a partnership or “S” corporation.

(C) In the case of an “S” corporation, the credit allowed under this section shall not be used by an “S” corporation as a credit against a tax imposed under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 23800) of Part 11 of Division 2.

(21) “Qualified visual effects” means visual effects where at least 75 percent or a minimum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of the qualified expenditures for the visual effects are paid or incurred in
 California.

(22) (A) “Qualified wages” means all of the following:

(i) Any wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code that were paid or incurred by any taxpayer involved in the production of a qualified motion picture with respect to a qualified individual for services performed on the qualified motion picture production within this state.

(ii) The portion of any employee fringe benefits paid or incurred by any taxpayer involved in the production of the qualified motion picture that are properly allocable to qualified wage amounts described in clauses (i), (iii), and (iv).

(iii) Any payments made to a qualified entity for services performed in this state by
 qualified individuals within the meaning of paragraph (17).

(iv) Remuneration paid to an independent contractor who is a qualified individual for services performed within this state by that qualified individual.

(B) “Qualified wages” shall not include any of the following:

(i) Expenses, including wages, related to new use, reuse, clip use, licensing, secondary markets, or residual compensation, or the creation of any ancillary product, including, but not limited to, a soundtrack album, toy, game, trailer, or teaser.

(ii) Expenses, including wages, paid or incurred with respect to acquisition, development, turnaround, or any rights thereto.

(iii) Expenses, including wages, related to
 financing, overhead, marketing, promotion, or distribution of a qualified motion picture.

(iv) Expenses, including wages, paid per person per qualified motion picture for writers, directors, music directors, music composers, music supervisors, producers, and performers, other than background actors with no scripted lines.

(23) (A) “Recurring television allocation amount” means the sum of the base year allocation and the product of all of the following:

(i) The base year allocation.

(ii) The number of subsequent years.

(iii) Three percent.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the following definitions
 apply:

(i) “Base year allocation” means the amount received by the recurring television series in its fiscal year 2025–26 Credit Allocation Letter or Letters, or if no amounts were reserved in fiscal year 2025–26, in the next fiscal year in which a Credit Allocation Letter or Letters were received.

(ii) “The number of subsequent years” means the number of full or partial fiscal years that have elapsed since the fiscal year in with the base year allocation was made.

(24) “Recurring television series” means any television series that was previously approved and issued a credit allocation letter under this section.

(25) “Residual compensation” means supplemental compensation paid at the time that a motion picture is exhibited through new use, reuse, clip
 use, or in secondary markets, as distinguished from payments made during production.

(26) “Reuse” means any use of a qualified motion picture in the same medium for which it was created, following the initial use in that medium.

(27) “Secondary markets” means media in which a qualified motion picture is exhibited following the initial media in which it is exhibited.

(28) “Television series that relocated to California” means a television series, without regard to episode length or initial media exhibition, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode, that filmed at least 75 percent of principal photography days in its most recent season outside of California or has filmed all seasons outside of California and for which the taxpayer certifies that the credit provided pursuant to
 this section is the primary reason for relocating to California.

(c) (1) (A) A qualified taxpayer may elect to assign any portion of the credit allowed under this section to one or more affiliated corporations for each taxable year in which the credit is allowed. In the event the qualified taxpayer is a single member limited liability company that is disregarded for tax purposes pursuant to Section 23038, the qualified taxpayer may elect to assign any portion of the credit allowed under this section to one or more affiliated corporations as if that single member limited liability company made the federal election to be classified as an association taxable as a corporation.

(B) For purposes of the election provided in subparagraph (A), all of the following shall apply:

(i) The election may be based on any method selected by the qualified taxpayer that originally receives the credit.

(ii) Once the election is made, it shall be irrevocable for the taxable year the credit is allowed.

(iii) The election may be changed for any subsequent taxable year if the election to make the assignment is expressly shown on each of the returns of the qualified taxpayer and the qualified taxpayer’s affiliated corporations that assign and receive the credits.

(iv) The election shall be reported to the Franchise Tax Board, in the form and manner specified by the Franchise Tax Board, along with all required information regarding the assignment of the credit, including the corporation number, the federal employer identification number, or other taxpayer identification number of the assignee,
 and the amount of the credit assigned.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, “affiliated corporation” has the same meaning provided in subdivision (b) of Section 25110, as of the last day of the taxable year in which the credit is allowed, except that “100 percent” is substituted for “more than 50 percent” wherever it appears in the section, and “voting common stock” is substituted for “voting stock” wherever it appears in the section.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, a qualified taxpayer may sell any credit allowed under this section that is attributable to an independent film, as defined in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b), to an unrelated party.

(3) The qualified taxpayer shall report to the Franchise Tax Board prior to the sale of the credit, in the form and manner specified by the Franchise Tax Board, all
 required information regarding the purchase and sale of the credit, including the social security or other taxpayer identification number of the unrelated party to whom the credit has been sold, the face amount of the credit sold, and the amount of consideration received by the qualified taxpayer for the sale of the credit.

(4) In the case where the credit allowed under this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess credit may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding eight taxable years, if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.

(5) A credit shall not be sold pursuant to this subdivision to more than one taxpayer, nor may the credit be resold by the unrelated party to another taxpayer or other party.

(6) A party that has been assigned or acquired tax credits under this
 subdivision shall be subject to the requirements of this section.

(7) In no event may a qualified taxpayer assign or sell any tax credit to the extent the tax credit allowed by this section is claimed on any tax return of the qualified taxpayer.

(8) In the event that both the taxpayer originally allocated a credit under this section by the California Film Commission and a taxpayer to whom the credit has been sold both claim the same amount of credit on their tax returns, the Franchise Tax Board may disallow the credit of either taxpayer, so long as the statute of limitations upon assessment remains open.

(9) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or
 issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this subdivision.

(10) Subdivision (g) or (i) of Section 23036 shall not apply to any credit sold or assigned pursuant to this subdivision.

(11) For purposes of this subdivision, the following shall apply:

(A) The unrelated party or parties that purchase a credit pursuant to paragraphs (2) to (10), inclusive, shall be treated as a qualified taxpayer pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(B) An affiliated corporation or corporations that are assigned a credit pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be treated as a qualified taxpayer pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(d) (1) No credit shall be allowed pursuant to
 this section unless the qualified taxpayer provides the following to the California Film Commission:

(A) Identification of each qualified individual.

(B) The specific start and end dates of production.

(C) The total wages paid.

(D) The total amount of qualified wages paid to qualified individuals.

(E) Aggregate data for individuals whose wages are excluded from qualified wages by clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (22) of subdivision (b), including their gender, ethnic, and racial makeup.

(F) The copyright registration number, as reflected on the certificate of registration issued under the authority of Section 410
 of Title 17 of the United States Code, relating to registration of claim and issuance of certificate. The registration number shall be provided on the return claiming the credit.

(G) The total amounts paid or incurred to purchase or lease tangible personal property used in the production of a qualified motion picture.

(H) Information to substantiate its qualified expenditures.

(I) Information required by the California Film Commission under regulations promulgated pursuant to subdivision (g) necessary to verify the amount of credit claimed.

(J) Data regarding the diversity of the workforce employed by the applicant on the qualified motion picture, as described in subdivision (g).

(K) Documentation verifying completion of the Career Readiness requirement.

(L) Documentation verifying that the qualified taxpayer paid the Career Pathways Program fee.

(2) (A) Based on the information provided in paragraph (1), the California Film Commission shall recompute the jobs ratio previously computed in subdivision (g) and compare this recomputed jobs ratio to the jobs ratio that the qualified taxpayer previously listed on the application submitted pursuant to subdivision (g).

(B) (i) If the California Film Commission determines that the jobs ratio has been reduced by more than 10 percent for a qualified motion picture, the California Film Commission shall reduce the amount of credit allowed by an equal percentage, unless the qualified taxpayer
 demonstrates, and the California Film Commission determines, that reasonable cause exists for the jobs ratio reduction.

(ii) If the California Film Commission determines that the jobs ratio has been reduced by more than 20 percent for a qualified motion picture, the California Film Commission shall not accept an application described in subdivision (g) from that qualified taxpayer or any member of the qualified taxpayer’s controlled group for a period of not less than one year from the date of that determination, unless the qualified taxpayer demonstrates, and the California Film Commission determines, that reasonable cause exists for the jobs ratio reduction.

(C) For the purposes of this paragraph, “reasonable cause” means unforeseen circumstances beyond the control of the qualified taxpayer, such as, but not limited to, the cancellation of a television series prior to the
 completion of the scheduled number of episodes or other similar circumstances as determined by the California Film Commission in regulations to be adopted pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) (1) (A) Subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the California Film Commission shall prescribe rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this section, including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) Subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) and clause (iv) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(ii) Any rules and regulations necessary to establish procedures, processes, requirements, and applications.

(iii) (I) Continuing a Career Pathways Program established pursuant to subdivision (e) of Sections 17053.98 and 23698, and pursuant to paragraph (10) of subdivision (g) of this section and Section 17053.98.1, to fund technical skills training for individuals from underserved communities for entry into film and television jobs. The program shall be funded by a fee equal to 0.5 percent of the approved credit amount for a qualified motion picture. The program shall work with nonprofit organizations that have an established record of training and job placement in the entertainment industry, focus on training individuals from traditionally underserved communities, and offer training courses focused on skilled, technical positions that would be eligible for qualified wages if performed on a qualified motion picture as well as administrative- and industry-related technical occupations or soft skills training for the motion picture
 industry.

(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), independent films are required to pay a fee equal to 0.25 percent of the approved credit amount for a qualified motion picture.

(iv) (I) Beginning January 1, 2028, the California Film Commission, in collaboration with labor and industry stakeholders, has the authority to increase the Career Pathways Training program fee by 0.25 percent per year, up to 1 percent of the approved credit amount for a qualified motion picture, based on evaluation of available information, including, but not limited to, the number of jobs available, job growth in the industry, and information included in the annual reports of the Career Pathways Training program required pursuant to paragraph (11) of subdivision (g). The evaluation shall be included in the annual report to the Legislature.

(II) Independent films are not subject to an increase to the fee pursuant to subclause (I).

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, prior to preparing a notice of proposed action pursuant to Section 11346.4 of the Government Code and prior to making any revision to the proposed regulation other than a change that is nonsubstantial or solely grammatical in nature, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall first approve the proposed regulation or proposed change to a proposed regulation regarding allocating the credit pursuant to subdivision (i), computing the jobs ratio as described in subdivisions (d) and (g), and defining “reasonable cause” pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(2) The California Film Commission shall not be required to prepare an economic impact analysis
 pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) with regard to any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) If the qualified taxpayer fails to provide the copyright registration number as required in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the credit shall be disallowed and assessed and collected under Section 19051 until the procedures are satisfied.

(g) For purposes of this section, the California Film Commission shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Subject to the requirements of subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2), on or after July 1, 2025, and before July 1, 2030, in four or more allocation periods per fiscal year, allocate tax credits
 to applicants.

(B) The California Film Commission shall increase the total credit amount allocated to an applicant by up to 2 percent of the initial credit amount allocated under this section, as determined by the California Film Commission, for qualified productions that employ trainees from a Career Pathways Program pursuant to subparagraph (E) of paragraph (10).
